Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-322
Reimbursement of costs.

Any veteran, spouse, surviving spouse, or parent admitted to one of the Nebraska veterans homes under section 80-316 who has an income in excess of forty dollars per month, including federal pension, compensation, or social security, or has sufficient assets will be required to reimburse the state monthly a reasonable amount for the expense of his or her maintenance. The amount shall be determined by the Veterans' Homes Board. All money paid to the state by members of the Nebraska veterans homes in compliance with this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 725.